Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2208
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Medicaid Access and Quality Act.

Laws 2025, LB527, § 8.